Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0269

"Professional gambling."

(1) A person is engaged in "professional gambling" for the purposes of this chapter when:

(a) Acting other than as a player or in the manner authorized by this chapter, the person knowingly engages in conduct which materially aids any form of gambling activity; or

(b) Acting other than in a manner authorized by this chapter, the person pays a fee to participate in a card game, contest of chance, lottery, or other gambling activity; or

(c) Acting other than as a player or in the manner authorized by this chapter, the person knowingly accepts or receives money or other property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any other person whereby he or she participates or is to participate in the proceeds of gambling activity; or

(d) The person engages in bookmaking; or

(e) The person conducts a lottery; or

(f) The person violates RCW 9.46.039.

(2) Conduct under subsection (1)(a) of this section, except as exempted under this chapter, includes but is not limited to conduct directed toward the creation or establishment of the particular game, contest, scheme, device or activity involved, toward the acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia, equipment or apparatus therefor, toward the solicitation or inducement of persons to participate therein, toward the actual conduct of the playing phases thereof, toward the arrangement of any of its financial or recording phases, or toward any other phase of its operation. If a person having substantial proprietary or other authoritative control over any premises shall permit the premises to be used with the person's knowledge for the purpose of conducting gambling activity other than gambling activities authorized by this chapter, and acting other than as a player, and the person permits such to occur or continue or makes no effort to prevent its occurrence or continuation, the person shall be considered as being engaged in professional gambling: PROVIDED, That the proprietor of a bowling establishment who awards prizes obtained from player contributions, to players successfully knocking down pins upon the contingency of identifiable pins being placed in a specified position or combination of positions, as designated by the posted rules of the bowling establishment, where the proprietor does not participate in the proceeds of the "prize fund" shall not be construed to be engaging in "professional gambling" within the meaning of this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the books and records of the games shall be open to public inspection.

[ 1997 c 78 s 1; 1996 c 252 s 2; 1987 c 4 s 18. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(17).]